Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.280

Catheterization of public and private school students.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Public school districts and private schools that offer classes for any of grades kindergarten through twelve must provide for clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of students, or assisted self-catheterization of students pursuant to RCW 18.79.290. The catheterization must be provided in substantial compliance with:

(a) Rules adopted by the *state nursing care quality assurance commission and the instructions of a registered nurse or **advanced registered nurse practitioner issued under such rules; and

(b) Written policies of the school district or private school which shall be adopted in order to implement this section and shall be developed in accordance with such requirements of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW as may be applicable.

(2) School district employees, except those licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, who have not agreed in writing to perform clean, intermittent bladder catheterization as a specific part of their job description, may file a written letter of refusal to perform clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of students. This written letter of refusal may not serve as grounds for discharge, nonrenewal, or other action adversely affecting the employee's contract status.

(3) Any public school district or private school that provides clean, intermittent bladder catheterization shall document the provision of training given to employees who perform these services. These records shall be made available for review at any audit.

[2003 c 172 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 721; 1988 c 48 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.31.160.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

**(2) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.